Hawaii, session 2026, GM1127.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. Section 46-1.5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows;
"§46-1.5 General powers and limitation of the counties.
Subject to general law, each county shall have the following
powers and shall be subject to the following liabilities and
limitations:
(1) Each county shall have the power to frame and adopt a
charter for its own self-government that shall
establish the county executive, administrative, and
legislative structure and organization, including but
not limited to the method of appointment or election
of officials, their duties, responsibilities, and
compensation, and the terms of their office;
(2) Each county shall have the power to provide for and
regulate the marking and lighting of all buildings and
other structures that may be obstructions or hazards
to aerial navigation, so far as may be necessary or
2026-2522 SB2140 CDl SMA.docx
MllliNHIlUinHIHIHIIIililll

Page 2
S.B. NO. S?,
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
proper for the protection and safeguarding of life,
health, and property;
(3) Each county shall have the power to enforce all claims
on behalf of the county and approve all lawful claims
against the county, but shall be prohibited from
entering into, granting, or making in any manner any
contract, authorization, allowance payment, or
liability contrary to the provisions of any county
charter or general law;
(4) Each county shall have the power to make contracts and
to do all things necessary and proper to carry into
execution all powers vested in the county or any
county officer;
(5) Each county shall have the power to:
(A) Maintain channels, whether natural or artificial,
including their exits to the ocean, in suitable
condition to carry off storm waters;
(B) Remove from the channels, and from the shores and
beaches, any debris that is likely to create an
unsanitary condition or become a public nuisance;
provided that, to the extent any of the foregoing
2026-2522 SB2140 CDl SMA.docx
IIMIIIIHMIIIfflIilliniHOHill

Page 3
S.B. NO.
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
work is a private responsibility, the
responsibility may be enforced by the county in
lieu of the work being done at public expense;
(C) Construct, acquire by gift, purchase, or by the
exercise of eminent domain, reconstruct, improve,
better, extend, and maintain projects or
undertakings for the control of and protection
against floods and flood waters, including the
power to drain and rehabilitate lands already
flooded;
(D) Enact zoning ordinances providing that lands
deemed subject to seasonable, periodic, or
occasional flooding shall not be used for
residence or other purposes in a manner as to
endanger the health or safety of the occupants
thereof, as required by the Federal Flood
Insurance Act of 1956 (chapter 1025, Public
Law 1016); and
(E) Establish and charge user fees to create and
maintain any stormwater management system or
infrastructure; provided that no county shall
i2i0i2i6M-25i2i2i iiSnB2i1n4i0i iCiDili inSMiAi.ndoiicHx

Page 4 2140
S.B. NO.
S.D. 1
H.D.2
C.D. 1
charge against or collect user fees from the
department of transportation in excess of
$1,500,000 in the aggregate per year; provided
further that no services shall be denied to the
department of transportation by reason of
nonpayment of the fees;
(6) Each county shall have the power to exercise the power
S of condemnation by eminent domain when it is in the
public interest to do so;
(7) Each county shall have the power to exercise
regulatory powers over business activity as are
assigned to them by chapter 445 or other general law;
(8) Each county shall have the power to fix the fees and
charges for all official services not otherwise
provided for;
(9) Each county shall have the power to provide by
ordinance assessments for the improvement or
maintenance of districts within the county;
(10) Except as otherwise provided, no county shall have the
power to give or loan credit to, or in aid of, any
2026-2522 SB2140 CDl SMA.docx
Hiiiiiiiiiiiimiiiiiiiii

Page 5
S.B. NO. S?i
C.D. 1
person or corporation, directly or indirectly, except
for a public purpose;
(11) Where not within the jurisdiction of the public
utilities commission, each county shall have the power
to regulate by ordinance the operation of motor
vehicle common carriers transporting passengers within
the county and adopt and amend rules the county deems
necessary for the public convenience and necessity;
(12) Each county shall have the power to enact and enforce
ordinances necessary to prevent or summarily remove
public nuisances and to compel the clearing or removal
of any public nuisance, refuse, and uncultivated
undergrowth from streets, sidewalks, public places,
and unoccupied lots. In connection with these powers,
each county may impose and enforce liens upon the
property for the cost to the county of removing and
completing the necessary work where the property
owners fail, after reasonable notice, to comply with
the ordinances. The authority provided by this
paragraph shall not be self-executing, but shall
become fully effective within a county only upon the
2026-2522 SB2140 CDl SMA.docx 5

Page 6
S.B. NO.
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
enactment or adoption by the county of appropriate and
particular laws, ordinances, or rules defining "public
nuisances" with respect to each county's respective
circumstances. The counties shall provide the
property owner with the opportunity to contest the
summary action and to recover the owner's property;
(13) Each county shall have the power to enact ordinances
deemed necessary to protect health, life, and
property, and to preserve the order and security of
the county and its inhabitants on any subject or
matter not inconsistent with, or tending to defeat,
the intent of any state statute where the statute does
not disclose an express or implied intent that the
statute shall be exclusive or uniform throughout the
State;
(14) Each county shall have the power to:
(A) Make and enforce within the limits of the county
all necessary ordinances covering all:
(i) Local police matters;
(ii) Matters of sanitation;
(iii) Matters of inspection of buildings;
2026-2522 SB2140 GDI SMA.docx 6
iBNiiiiiiinmniHiiM

Page 7 2140
S.B. NO.
S.D. 1
H,D.2
C.D. 1
(iv) Matters of condemnation of unsafe
structures, plumbing, sewers, dairies, milk,
fish, and morgues; and
(v) Matters of the collection and disposition of
rubbish and garbage;
(B) Provide exemptions for homeless facilities and
any other program for the homeless authorized by
part XVII of chapter 346, for all matters under
this paragraph;
(C) Appoint ’county physicians and sanitary and other
inspectors as necessary to carry into effect
ordinances made under this paragraph, who shall
have the same power as given by law to agents of
the department of health, subject only to
limitations placed on them by the terms and
conditions of their appointments; and
(D) Fix a penalty for the violation of any ordinance,
which penalty may be a misdemeanor, petty
misdemeanor, or violation as defined by general
law;
2026-2522 SB2140 GDI SMA.docx
lilMllimillHIIIMIII

S.B. NO.
SS?,
H.D.2
C.D. 1
(15) Each county shall have the power to provide public
pounds; to regulate the impounding of stray animals
and fowl, and their disposition; and to provide for
the appointment, powers, duties, and fees of animal
control officers;
(16) Each county shall have the power to purchase and
otherwise acquire, lease, and hold real and personal
property within the defined boundaries of the county
and to dispose of the real and personal property as
the interests of the inhabitants of the county may
require[7—oxGcpt]; provided that:
(A) Any property held for school purposes [fftay] shall
not be disposed of without the consent of the
superintendent of education;
(B) No property bordering the ocean shall be sold or
otherwise disposed of; and
(C) All proceeds from the sale of park lands shall be
expended only for the acquisition of property for
park or recreational purposes;
(17) Each county shall have the power to provide by charter
for the prosecution of all offenses and to prosecute
2026-2522 SB2140 GDI SMA.docx
iiiiifliiiiMiiBiiiiiiiiiinii

S.B. NO.
CD. 1
for offenses against the laws of the State under the
authority of the attorney general of the State;
(18) Each county shall have the power to make
appropriations in amounts deemed appropriate from any
moneys in the treasury, for the purpose of:
(A) Community promotion and public celebrations;
(B) The entertainment of distinguished persons as may
from time to time visit the county;
(C) The entertainment of other distinguished persons,
as well as[—] public officials^ when deemed to be
in the best interest of the community; and
(D) The rendering of civic tribute to individuals
who, by virtue of their accomplishments and
community service, merit civic commendations,
recognition, or remembrance;
(19) Each county shall have the power to:
(A) Construct, purchase, take on lease, lease,
sublease, or in any other manner acquire, manage,
maintain, or dispose of buildings for county
purposes, sewers, sewer systems, pumping
stations, waterworks, including reservoirs.
2026-2522 SB2140 CDl SMA.docx 9
IlilllllNMINiniHIIIMIIII

Page 10 2140
S.B. NO
S.D. 1
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
wells, pipelines, and other conduits for
distributing water to the public, lighting
plants, and apparatus and appliances for lighting
streets and public buildings, and manage.
regulate, and control the same;
(B) Regulate and control the location and quality of
all appliances necessary to the furnishing of
water, heat, light, power, telephone, and
telecommunications service to the county;
Acquire, regulate. and control any and all
appliances for the sprinkling and cleaning of the
streets and the public ways, and for flushing the
sewers; and
(D) Open, close, construct, or maintain county
highways or charge toll on county highways;
provided that all revenues received from a toll
charge shall be used for the construction or
maintenance of county highways;
(20) Each county shall have the power to regulate the
renting, subletting, and rental conditions of property
for places of abode by ordinance;
2026-2522 SB2140 CDl SMA.docx 10
MIIINIIIIIIIIIIIIIIHHIII

Page 11
S.B. NO. El
C.D. 1
(21) Unless otherwise provided by law, each county shall
have the power to establish by ordinance the order of
succession of county officials in the event of a
military or civil disaster;
(22) Each county shall have the power to sue and be sued in
its corporate name;
(23) Each county shall have the power to:
(A) Establish and maintain waterworks and sewer
works;
(B) Implement a sewer monitoring program that
includes the inspection of sewer laterals that
connect to county sewers, when those laterals are
located on public or private property, after
providing a property owner not less than ten
calendar days' written notice, to detect leaks
from laterals, infiltration, and inflow, any
other law to the contrary notwithstanding;
(C) Compel an owner of private property upon which is
located any sewer lateral that connects to a
county sewer to inspect that lateral for leaks.
2026-2522 SB2140 CDl SMA.docx
iiiiiinimiiiiioiniHiiiiH

Page 12 2140
S.B. NO.
S.D. 1
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
infiltration, and inflow and to perform repairs
as necessary;
(D) Collect rates for water supplied to consumers and
for the use of sewers;
(E) Install water meters whenever deemed expedient;
provided that owners of premises having vested
water rights under existing laws appurtenant to
the premises shall not be charged for the
installation or use of the water meters on the
premises;
(F) Take over from the State existing waterworks
systems, including water rights, pipelines, and
other appurtenances belonging thereto, and sewer
systems, and to enlarge, develop, and improve the
same; and
(G) For purposes of subparagraphs (B) and (C):
(i) "Infiltration" means groundwater, rainwater,
and saltwater that enters the county sewer
system through cracked, broken, or defective
sewer laterals; and
2026-2522 SB2140 CDl SMA.docx 12

Page 13
S.B. NO.
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
"Inflow" means non-sewage entering the
county sewer system via inappropriate or
illegal connections;
(24) (A) Each county may impose civil fines, in addition
to criminal penalties, for any violation of
county ordinances or rules after reasonable
notice and requests to correct or cease the
violation have been made upon the violator. Any
administratively imposed civil fine shall not be
collected until after an opportunity for a
hearing under chapter 91. Any appeal shall be
filed within thirty days from the date of the
final written decision. These proceedings shall
not be a prerequisite for any civil fine or
injunctive relief ordered by the circuit court;
(B) Each county by ordinance may provide for the
addition of any unpaid civil fines, ordered by
any court of competent jurisdiction, to any
taxes, fees, or charges, with the exception of
fees or charges for water for residential use and
sewer charges, collected by the county. Each
2026-2522 SB2140 CDl SMA.docx 13

Page 14
S.B. NO. ""
H.D.2
C.D. 1
county by ordinance may also provide for the
addition of any unpaid administratively imposed
civil fines[7—whieh] that remain due after all
judicial review rights under section 91-14 are
exhausted [7-] to any taxes, fees, or charges, with
the exception of water for residential use and
sewer charges, collected by the county. The
ordinance shall specify the administrative
procedures for the addition of the unpaid civil
fines to the eligible taxes, fees, or charges and
may require hearings or other proceedings. After
addition of the unpaid civil fines to the taxes,
fees, or charges, the unpaid civil fines shall
not become a part of any taxes, fees, or charges.
The county by ordinance may condition the
issuance or renewal of a license, approval, or
permit for which a fee or charge is assessed,
except for water for residential use and sewer
charges, on payment of the unpaid civil fines.
Upon recordation of a notice of unpaid civil
fines in the bureau of conveyances, the amount of
2026-2522 SB2140 GDI SMA.docx

Page 15 2140
S.B. NO
S.D. 1
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
the civil fines, including any increase in the
amount of the fine [which] that the county may
assess, shall constitute a lien upon all real
property or rights to real property belonging to
any person liable for the unpaid civil fines.
The lien in favor of the county shall be
subordinate to any lien in favor of any person
recorded or registered [p«ree—te] before the
recordation of the notice of unpaid civil fines
and senior to any lien recorded or registered
after the recordation of the notice. The lien
shall continue until the unpaid civil fines are
paid in full or until a certificate of release or
partial release of the lien, prepared by the
county at the owner's expense, is recorded. The
notice of unpaid civil fines shall state the
amount of the fine as of the date of the notice
and maximum permissible daily increase of the
fine. The county shall not be required to
include a social security number, state general
excise taxpayer identification number, or federal
2026-2522 SB2140 GDI SMA.docx 15
iBiiiniiiiiiininiiiMiiiiiiiw

Page 16 2140
S.B. NO.
S.D. 1
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
employer identification number on the notice.
Recordation of the notice in the bureau of
conveyances shall be deemed, at [ouch] that time,
for all purposes and without any further action,
to procure a lien on land registered in land
court under chapter 501. After the unpaid civil
fines are added to the taxes, fees, or charges as
specified by county ordinance, the unpaid civil
fines shall be deemed immediately due, owing, and
delinquent and may be collected in any lawful
manner. The procedure for collection of unpaid
civil fines authorized in this paragraph shall be
in addition to any other procedures for
collection available to the State and county by
law or rules of the courts;
(C) Each county may impose civil fines upon any
person who places graffiti on any real or
personal property owned, managed, or maintained
by the county. The fine may be up to $1,000 or
may be equal to the actual cost of having the
damaged property repaired or replaced. The
2026-2522 SB2140 CDl SMA.docx 16
■lllinillllllllMllllliWIM

Page 17 2140
S.B. NO.
S.D. 1
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
parent or guardian having custody of a minor who
places graffiti on any real or personal property
owned, managed, or maintained by the county shall
be jointly and severally liable with the minor
for any civil fines imposed hereunder. [Any
ouoh] The fine may be administratively imposed
after an opportunity for a hearing under chapter
91, but [sueb] a proceeding shall not be a
prerequisite for any civil fine ordered by any
court. As used in this subparagraph, "graffiti"
means any unauthorized drawing, inscription,
figure, or mark of any type intentionally created
by paint, ink, chalk, dye, or similar substances;
(D) At the completion of an appeal in which the
county's enforcement action is affirmed and upon
correction of the violation if requested by the
violator, the case shall be reviewed by the
county agency that imposed the civil fines to
determine the appropriateness of the amount of
the civil fines that accrued while the appeal
proceedings were pending. In its review of the
i2i0i2i6i-i2i5i2i2i iiSnB2u14i0i wCDnl iSlMiiAl.idioHcxi

Page 18 2140
S.B. NO.
S.D. 1
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
amount of the accrued fines, the county agency
may consider:
(i) The nature and egregiousness of the
violation;
(ii) The duration of the violation;
(iii) The number of recurring and other similar
violations;
(iv) Any effort taken by the violator to correct
the violation;
(v) The degree of involvement in causing or
continuing the violation;
(vi) Reasons for any delay in the completion of
the appeal; and
(vii) Other extenuating circumstances.
The civil fine that is imposed by administrative
order after this review is completed and the
violation is corrected shall be subject to
judicial review, notwithstanding any provisions
for administrative review in county charters;
(E) After completion of a review of the amount of
accrued civil fine by the county agency that
2026-2522 SB2140 GDI SMA.docx 18
HillllMiniilNIMIBBinil

Page 19 2140
S.B. NO.
S.D. 1
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
imposed the fine, the amount of the civil fine
determined appropriate, including both the
initial civil fine and any accrued daily civil
fine, shall immediately become due and
collectible following reasonable notice to the
violator. If no review of the accrued civil fine
is requested. the amount of the civil fine, not
to exceed the total accrual of civil fine [pr-ior
•fee] before correcting the violation, shall
immediately become due and collectible following
reasonable notice to the violator, at the
completion of all appeal proceedings; and
(F) If no county agency exists to conduct appeal
proceedings for a particular civil fine action
taken by the county, then one shall be
established by ordinance before the county shall
impose the civil fine;
(25) Any law to the contrary notwithstanding, any county
mayor, by executive order, may exempt donors, provider
agencies, homeless facilities, and any other program
for the homeless under part XVII of chapter 346 from
2026-2522 SB2140 CDl SMA.docx 19
IHlIillllliillNIIIIIIIIIIIIH

Page 20 S.B. NO. Ei
C.D. 1
real property taxes, water and sewer development fees,
rates collected for water supplied to consumers and
for use of sewers, and any other county taxes,
charges, or fees; provided that any county may enact
ordinances to regulate and grant the exemptions
granted by this paragraph;
(26) Any county may establish a captive insurance company
pursuant to article 19, chapter 431; [end]
(27) Each county shall have the power to enact and enforce
ordinances regulating towing operations[—]; and
(28) Each county may:
(A) Require a contractor, as defined in section
444-1, to disclose information regarding its
employees' wages, benefits, hours, and employment
status; and
_(^ Deny, revolce, or suspend a building permit
application if a contractor, as defined in
section 444-1, is found to be in violation of
laws as determined by the department of labor and
industrial relations or judicial order relating
to wages, benefits, hours, and employment status;
2026-2522 SB2140 CDl SMA.docx 2
■lililMllilHIliill

Page 21
S.B. NO. s"
C.D. 1
provided that upon the revocation or suspension
of a building permit pursuant to this
subparagraph, the county shall:
(i) Notify the property owner within five
business days;
(ii) Provide the owner an opportunity to select a
replacement contractor; and
(iii) Process the application within five business
days after receipt of a complete
application;
Provided further that the replacement contractor
shall demonstrate compliance with all applicable
licensing and labor laws; previously approved
plans, conditions, and inspections shall remain
valid for purposes of the expedited transfer to a
replacement contractor unless the scope of work
is materially altered; and this subparagraph
shall not apply to a building permit application
submitted by an owner-occupant for work performed
on the owner-occupant's residence."
2026-2522 SB2140 GDI SMA.docx 21
inWMIIIIIIMIIlliMIIIIIHII

Page 22
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
SECTION 2. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2026-2522 SB2140 CDl SMA.docx 22
IIIIIIIIIIMMHIiinillHII

S.B. NO. ""
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 22nd day of May , 2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAI‘I

S.B. No. 2140, S.D. 1, H.D. 2, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAI‘I
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
President of the Senate
Clerk of the Senate
41-26

SB No. 2140, SD 1, HD 2, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives